Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.910

Chapter controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.910. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 26.]